Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 4
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Funds and Management of Assets

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 11, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 381, § 3: Mar. 12, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that flexibility in the investments available to the respective publicly-supported retirement systems in this State is essential to enable such retirement systems to obtain dependable income yields from investments; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Boards of Trustees of the retirement systems to invest funds in subordinated debt securities of federally insured savings and loan associations in this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 549, § 16: Mar. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the unprecedented increase in the cost of living has resulted in a particular hardship to persons living on a fixed retirement income in the State of Arkansas; that it is essential to the health and well being of the retired and active schoolteachers of this State that the benefits received by them be increased immediately to offset this unusual cost of living increase and that this act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 793, § 12: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a uniform retirement policy for the State of Arkansas is essential to maintain employee morale and a stable and improved retirement system commensurate with the ability of the taxpayers of this State to finance, yet without jeopardizing retirement benefits of persons now employed by the State who do not elect to participate in the new retirement plan. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 681, § 14: Apr. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 365, § 9: Mar. 9, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 805, § 12: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1989, No. 472, § 4: Mar. 10, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the effectiveness of this Act is essential to the operation of the Teacher Retirement System; that in order for the 77th General Assembly to set the rate of employer contribution for the Teacher Retirement System for the next biennial period, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately upon its passage and approval. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 14: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 14, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 17, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the amendments herein are essential to the continued operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 43, § 11: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 431, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991, is essential to the sound funding of the Teacher Retirement System and the Public Employees' Retirement System; that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 300, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that the change in the procedure for imposing late penalties on participating employers who are habitually late in making remittances to the Teacher Retirement System need to be updated and made stricter and that the change in the law is essential to the continued efficient operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 435, § 12: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that changed conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 460, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current language in the federal Internal Revenue Code makes it imperative that changes be made in laws concerning the Teacher Retirement System; that those changes need to be made at the beginning of the state fiscal year on July 1st; and that these changes are essential to the continued efficient and effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, in order to maintain an effective administration of the System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 542, § 10: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changing conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 206, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency. It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current language in the federal Internal Revenue Code makes it imperative that changes be made in laws of the Teacher Retirement System regarding employee contributions for income tax treatment purposes to save the members' money; that administrative efficiency dictates those changes be made at the beginning of the state fiscal year on July 1st; and that these changes are essential to the protect the financial interests of the membership of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, in order to protect the members of the System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 393, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eight-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this amendment to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System laws is essential to the equitable administration of the filing of contributory and noncontributory elections for active members of the System and it is essential for this act to be effective immediately as the State's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote equitable situations in the Teacher Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 11, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law does not recognize certain payments made by schools to teaching personnel as salary payments as defined under the retirement law, that allowing a broader definition of salary will help members achieve higher salaries for credit in the retirement system, that by increasing the benefits to members, more educators will be encouraged to stay in the teaching career fields, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 81, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System provides members with the option to choose either a contributory or noncontributory membership, that keeping track of these options consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be simplified to reduce the cost and effort of keeping track of these options, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time, therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 864, § 6: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System currently provides members with noncontributory retirement service credit; that some members need to have contributory service credit to provide for an adequate retirement; and that providing for a change to contributory credited service will improve the motivation and effectiveness of the active teachers in Arkansas public schools. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 907, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty Second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Teacher Retirement System provides members with the option to choose either a contributory or noncontributory membership, that Act 81 of 1999 will end this option and that some members need to have option restored to them, and that since Act 81 of 1999 will go into effect on July 1, 1999 then this act should be effective at the same time in order to avoid any statutory ambiguity. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 5: Retroactive to January 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 7: Feb. 8, 2001. The emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law need to be reconciled with federal tax laws; that these changes should take place retroactively to January 1, 2001; and that this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 385, § 10: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system; that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort; that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 1968, § 3: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain changes are necessary to allow the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to set employer contribution rates; that the members of the system will benefit from these changes; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 19, § 10: Apr. 11, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Supreme Court declared the public school funding system to be inadequate and that public schools are operating under a constitutional infirmity which must be corrected immediately; that to correct the constitutional infirmity and to ensure adequate funding for public education, the General Assembly must revise the public school funding formula, revise laws regarding public school facilities, provide funding for retirement increases and limit additional increases; and enact other necessary reform measures; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that reform measures are available to public schools for the 2005-2006 and 2006-2007 school years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 93, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System regarding contributory and noncontributory status require revision; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 467, § 2:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 41, § 3: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex and the system must be able to create accounts as needed to appropriately manage the system's funds; that the members' contributions are received in the members' deposit account and the interest is calculated and credited to the member from another account; that the law as currently enacted regarding members' deposit accounts does not accurately reflect the accounting of the contributions and the calculation of interest due; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 448, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act related to funds and management of assets are in need of revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 602, § 2: Apr. 4, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to bring the retirement laws into conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System member contributions may need to be adjusted from time to time to keep the system financially sound and to provide a proper retirement benefit to all its members; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1399, § 2: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to bring them into compliance with sound public pension policy; that revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer contribution rate may need to be adjusted to keep the system actuarially sound; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 550, § 2: Mar. 21, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 821, § 2: Apr. 3, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; that the system will need to act immediately in order to adequately implement any changes authorized by this act; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 297, § 3: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System maintains a system of member records that reflect the contributory or noncontributory status of each member in the system according to the laws in effect at the time and, if an election was made, the election of a member; that numerous laws enacted over many legislative sessions have modified, amended, or repealed the laws enacted in previous sessions concerning the contributory or noncontributory status of members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that accurately keeping track of these election options requires precise administrative recordkeeping and understanding of the laws in effect at the time a member first entered the system or was allowed to exercise a membership option; that the laws need to be simplified to reduce the risk of confusion of keeping track of these election options; and that this act is necessary because the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.
